Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 7. MENTAL HEALTH AND INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY

SUBTITLE B. STATE FACILITIES

CHAPTER 554. STATE CENTERS AND HOMES

Sec. 554.0001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "department" means the Department of State Health Services.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1345, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 554.001. ADMISSION OF CERTAIN JUVENILES. (a) The department shall use the Waco Center for Youth as a residential treatment facility for emotionally disturbed juveniles who:

(1) have been admitted under Subtitle C to a facility of the department; or

(2) are under the managing conservatorship of the Department of Family and Protective Services and have been admitted under Subtitle C to the Waco Center for Youth.

(b) An emotionally disturbed juvenile who has been found to have engaged in delinquent conduct or conduct indicating a need for supervision under Title 3, Family Code, may not be admitted to the Waco Center for Youth.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 8.077, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 427 (S.B. 957), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 554.002. SERVICES. (a) The department shall provide without charge appropriate education services for all clients residing at the Waco Center for Youth.

(b) The department shall pay for those services from funds appropriated to the center for that purpose.

(c) A client of the center who is not a resident of the Waco Independent School District may receive education services from the Waco Independent School District only with the prior approval of the superintendent of the district.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.